District of Columbia statutes.
16-3545

Verdict and judgment.

Where a defendant in a quo warranto proceeding is found by the jury to have usurped, intruded into, or unlawfully held or exercised an office or franchise, the verdict shall be that he is guilty of the act or acts in question, and judgment shall be rendered that he be ousted and excluded therefrom and that the relator recover his costs.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 603, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 563, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(n)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-3545.
1973 Ed., § 16-3545.